Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1238
Exemption from taxation; Property Tax Administrator; duties.

(1) For tax years prior to tax year 2020, every person who is required to list his or her taxable tangible personal property as defined in section 77-105, as required under section 77-1229, shall receive an exemption from taxation for the first ten thousand dollars of valuation of his or her tangible personal property in each tax district as defined in section 77-127 in which a personal property return is required to be filed. Failure to report tangible personal property on the personal property return required by section 77-1229 shall result in a forfeiture of the exemption for any tangible personal property not timely reported for that year.

(2) For tax years prior to tax year 2020, the Property Tax Administrator shall reduce the value of the tangible personal property owned by each railroad, car line company, public service entity, and air carrier by a compensating exemption factor to reflect the exemption allowed in subsection (1) of this section for all other personal property taxpayers. The compensating exemption factor is calculated by multiplying the value of the tangible personal property of the railroad, car line company, public service entity, or air carrier by a fraction, the numerator of which is the total amount of locally assessed tangible personal property that is actually subjected to property tax after the exemption allowed in subsection (1) of this section, and the denominator of which is the net book value of locally assessed tangible personal property prior to the exemptions allowed in subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 2015, LB259, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 125.